Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.232.030

Attendance and truancy definitions—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules to bring consistency and uniformity to attendance and truancy definitions in the alternative learning experience setting, establish procedures for addressing truancy in all alternative learning experience courses, leverage existing systems to facilitate truancy actions between school districts and courts when the student has transferred out of his or her resident district to enroll in an alternative learning experience course; and clarify the responsibility of school districts in the event of rescinding a student transfer.

[ 2017 c 291 s 9.]